ktu_CD/ktu_CD.aff
# This Source Code Form is subject to the terms of the Mozilla Public
# License, v. 2.0. If a copy of the MPL was not distributed with this
# file, You can obtain one at http://mozilla.org/MPL/2.0/.

# AFFIXES DU DICTIONNAIRE ORTHOGRAPHIQUE KIKONGO
# par L'Africain
# Généré le 19-06-2017 à 10:06
# Pour améliorer le dictionnaire, allez sur 



SET UTF-8

WORDCHARS -’'1234567890.


TRY esntiarulodcpmvfgbhxjyMILzACPJFSBVRDGNETHXkOwKWYU'


PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 ba .

PFX M Y 1
PFX M di ma di

PFX B Y 1
PFX B 0 ku .

PFX I Y 1
PFX I 0 ki .

PFX N Y 1
PFX N ki bi ki

PFX J Y 1
PFX J mu ba mu

PFX P Y 1
PFX P mu mi mu

PFX C Y 1
PFX C 0 kudi .

PFX O Y 1
PFX O 0 kuki .

SFX D Y 1
SFX D a ila a

SFX E Y 1
SFX E a isa a

SFX F Y 1
SFX F 0 ma

SFX G Y 1
SFX G 0 na

SFX H Y 1
SFX H 0 ka

SFX K Y 1
SFX K a ilaka a

SFX L Y 1
SFX L a isaka a

SFX Q Y 1
SFX Q 0 naka

SFX R Y 1
SFX R 0 maka
