ktu_CD/ktu_CD.dic
baka/BEFGHDCL
bakala/A
bala/BHG
baluka/BHCEDG
bamba/BHEGC
bana-bwala/A
banda/BHDK
bangika/HDK
bangisa/BHED
bansa/BHDC
basika/BEHLDF
basisa/BHD
beba/EKGHBL
bedisa/BCHEL
bela/BHDE
beluka/BHE
belula/BH
benda/BEFGCHD
bendumuka/BHKD
biblia/A
bika/BHGEDLK
bikala/BHG
binga/BHFDGE
bindika/BHEL
boka/CBFGH
bokilo/A
bondila/BHC
bonga/BEFGH
bongisa/BHFDL
bota/BEFGH
botika/BH
botika/BHEF
botula/BHDEC
budila/BHCED
budisa/BHEDC
buka/BHEDLKG
buku/A
bula/BHFGC
bumba/BHDELCKLQG
bumbisama/BH
bundana/BEL
bunduki/A
buta/BHEDFKLG
butuka/BHDEK
buya/BHED
bwa/BHDECKL
bwanda/A
bweta/BHDFGC
defa/BHELDGK
denda/BHDEK
dendisa/BHDK
dia/BFGH
diata/BHFGEC
dibaku/M
dibala/M
dibansa/M
dibanza/M
dibanzi/M
dibata/M
dibaya/M
dibela/M
dibele/M
dibenga/M
dibengi/M
diboko/M
dibolongo/M
dibolu/M
dibondo/M
dibuka/M
dibuki/M
dibula/M
dibulu/M
dibundu/M
dibungu/M
dibuta/M
didame/M
didelene/M
dideso/M
didesu/M
dienga/BCGA
difemba/M
difingu/M
dikabu/M
dikaku/M
dikala/M
dikambu/M
dikasu/M
dikayabu/M
dikefu/M
dikofi/M
dikonga/M
dikulu/M
dikundu/M
dikuta/M
dikwela/M
dila/BHCG
dilangwa/M
dilongi/M
dima/BK
dimbuma/M
dimpa/M
dinanasi/M
dinda/BHEDCL
dindalala/M
dingulu/M
diniama/M
dinkondo/M
dinsala-disu/M
dinsanga/M
dinsendele/M
dintete/M
dinzanza/M
dipa/CBH
dipapa/M
dipasa/M
diputa/M
disa/BHGC
disangu/M
disoka/M
disumu/M
ditabisi/M
ditaku/M
ditama/M
dititi/M
ditubi/M
dituluku/M
dituti/M
divunga/M
diyansi/M
diyoto/M
dizita/M
dodokila/BHE
etireti/A
ferme/A
feta/BHFEG
fidisa/BHLE
fika/BHDCF
fina/BHFGE
finga/BHDEC
finika/BHC
fisa/BHDEKL
fofolo/A
fonga/BHED
fukama/BHCED
fukimina/BGH
fukimisa/BEDH
fuluka/BHD
fulula/BHC
fulusa/HBD
fumbama/BEG
fumsula/BH
funda/BHDGM
funvulu/A
futa/BHEDFL
futumuka/BHGD
futumuna/BCH
fwa/ABCEDLGH
fwana/BHEGC
fweta/BHEDC
fwila/BHG
gambula/BHG
ganga/BHFE
goma/BHGEDF
gonda/BHEC
gonga/BHEL
guluka/HBDEKL
kaba/BEHGDKL
kabisana/BH
kabula/BHEL
kabwana/BHE
kakula/BHEC
kibulu/N
kimenina/N
kakunda/A
kalinga/BHEDF
kalvari/A
kamuna/BHED
kanga/BHFGEDR
kangamina/BH
kangimisa/BH
kangisa/BHFGEDC
kangula/BHFGC
kanina/BHDK
kapita/A
kashinji/A
katudila/BH
katuka/HDBFE
kauka/BHF
kawuka/BH
kaye/A
keba/BEFGHL
kemba/BEFGHDL
kibaka/N
kibakala/N
kibansala/N
kibende/N
kibombi/N
kibuba/N
kibuti/N
kidia-mfuka/A
kidila/N
kidimbu/N
kiese/N
kifiniku/N
kifufu/N
kifuta/N
kifwa-makutu/N
kifwa-nisu/N
kifwa-nzo/N
kifwanisu/N
kigonsa/N
kikalangu/N
kikalungu/N
kikata/N
kikedi/N
kikokila/N
kikonko/N
kikunda/N
kikuta/N
kilandi/N
kilanga/N
kilawu/N
kileku/N
kima/N
kimbeni/N
kimenga/N
kimfumu/N
kimpela/N
kimpika/N
kimpusu/N
kimvwama/N
kina/BHCEDL
kinanasi/N
kinga/BDEGH
kingana/N
kingoma/N
kingungulu/N
kinila/BH
kinkokoto/N
kinkoso/N
kinsweki/N
kinuka/N
kinzambi/N
kintuntu/N
kisaka-saka/N
kisalu/N
kisambulu/N
kisanuna/N
kiswekilu/N
kisika/N
kisina/N
kisiwu/N
kisoni/N
kita/BEDC
kitadi/N
kitambi/N
kitari/N
kiteki/N
kitendi/N
kiti/N
kitisa/BHDC
kitodi/N
kituka/BHKD
kitula/BHGC
kitwisi/N
kivumbi/N
kivunda/N
kiwina/N
kiyeka/N
kiyungulu/N
kizengilu/N
kizietisu/N
kolama/BH
komba/BHED
kombulula/BH
konda/BHEDCGKL
kosula/BH
kota/BHEDGCKL
kristu/A
kala/BH
kula/BHFG
lemba-lemba/BH
kulula/BFGNC
kulumusa/BCOHED
luta-luta/BH
kuma/BHELDC
kumina/BHGDE
kuna-kuna/BH
kuna/BHEFKL
nanga/BHLE
kunina/BH
kuningisa/BHDEKL
kusa/BHCGEFK
kuta/BHEGD
kutana/BHEL
zieta-zieta/BH
kwamina/BHEG
kwangila/BH
kwenda/BHCDEG
kwikila/BH
kwisa/HDBK
ladisa/BH
lamba/BHEKD
lanba/BHDEKL
landa/BHGDEKL
lauka/BH
lawuka/BHEDC
leba/BHGF
leka/BHC
leke/AI
lemba/BHGFCAEL
lembika/BHEL
lembulula/BH
lembwa/BHEL
lemfuka/BDHK
lemfula/BH
lenga/BHGDK
lenzi/A
loba/BEH
loka/BHCGKD
lokuta/BHEDF
lolakana/BH
lolula/GBHF
lomba/ABHFDE
longa/BHEDLMC
longisila/BH
longuka/BHDEKL
longula/BHC
losa/BHFGDC
ludimi/A
luka/BHEDCKL
lukwikilu/A
lula/BHC
lunda/BHEDFLK
lunga/BHDFEGL
lungisila/BH
lupanzi/A
luse/A
luta/BEDHKLG
luyotisu/A
lwadisa/BHG
lwata/BHEDKL
mafulu/A
makoki/A
mambu/A
mana/BEHL
mapolomi/A
mata/BHEDGKL
matanga/A
mazaya/A
mbandu/A
mbangi/AI
mbefo/AI
mbendumuka/BHEDG
mboma/A
mbuluku/A
mbuta-muntu/AI
mbuta-nganga/AI
mbuta/AI
mbutu/A
meka/BHEDCF
mena/BHE
menga/BEGHN
mfinda/A
mfunguna/BHEC
munzenza/P
misioni/A
musopi/P
musosodi/P
mona/BHGELC
monika/BAHED
mpaka/A
mpangi/AI
mpete/A
mpumbuka/BH
mpunda/A
mubunda/J
mudefi/P
mudidi/P
mudindu/P
mufinuku/P
mufwidi/P
muhangu/P
muka/P
mukaba/P
mukanda/P
mukanzi/P
mukati/P
mukengi/P
mukengedi/P
mukidi/P
mukila/P
mukobo/P
mukongo/J
mukristu/J
mukubi/P
mukubu/P
mukuku/P
mukusa/P
mukwa/P
mukwenu/P
mukweto/P
mulangi/P
mulobi/J
mulobi-mbisi/J
muloki/P
mulolo/P
mulombi/P
mulonga/P
mulongi/P
mumbala/J
mumbimbi/P
mumbungu/P
mumpanga/P
mumpani/P
mumpe/P
mumpika/J
mumvudi/P
munati/P
mundele/P
mundimi/P
munduki/P
munene/P
mungamba/P
munganga/P
munganzi/P
mungungu/P
muniokolo/P
munkanzi/P
munkayi/P
munkuku/P
mukunzi/P
munkwa/J
munoko/P
munsonso/P
mununu/P
munzenza/J
mupende/J
mupepe/P
musaka/P
musambi/P
musambisi/P
musantu/J
musapi/P
muselekete/P
musembu/P
musenzi/P
musisa/P
musobi/P
musopo/P
musumbi/P
musuni/P
mususu/P
mutalaka/P
mutambi/P
mutambu/P
mutindu/P
mutumbambila/P
mutungisi/P
muyaka/J
muyansi/J
muyibi/PI
muziki/P
mvita/A
mvwela/A
mwanga/ABHGED
mwesa/BDHK
mweta/BHED
nangudila/BH
nata/BHEDG
ndeke/A
ndoki/AI
ndola/A
ndumba/AI
ndunda/A
nenina/BHC
ngana/BHGN
ngasi/A
ngenga/BHEDLK
ngoma/A
ngunga/A
ngyituka/A
niata/BHFC
nieka/BHEF
niekamisa/BH
niema/BHCED
nika/BHFGEDCLQ
nioka/ABHF
niokudisa/BH
niokula/BHF
nionga/BHFED
nkaka/A
nkeni/A
nkombo/A
nkwa-mpasi/A
noka/BEDHL
nsadisi/A
nsambukila/GBH
nsansa/BHFGC
nsende/A
nsimbulu/A
nsiona/AN
nsonso/A
nsukami/AI
nsunga/A
ntangu/A
nti/A
ntomboka/BHE
ntonda/BHFC
ntulu/A
ntumba/BHF
nuka/BHECQ
nuna/BEL
nunga/BHE
nwa/BHEL
nwana/BHELK
nwana-nwana/BH
nwanikisa/BHGF
nwanina/BH
nzala/A
nzenza/A
ziunga/BHEDG
nzo/A
nzuluka/BHEC
pakasa/A
pakula/BHC
pambuka/BHECG
pangusa/BH
panza/BHGEDQ
panzana-panzana/BH
pasuka/BHDC
pasula/BHG
pawu/A
pedisa/BHDEKL
pema/BHEL
pepa/BHEDC
pesa/BHODCG
pia/BHEDC
pidipidi/A
pima/BHEL
pimina/BH
pindula/BH
podisa/BHC
pompa/BHEC
pona/BHFC
posi/A
profeta/AI
pukumuna/BH
pupa/BHEG
pupula/BHNC
pusa/BHDGD
pwaro/A
sabusa/BHED
sadila/BHC
sadisa/BHCG
sakanina/BH
sala/BHFG
salakana/BH
salama/BHEL
samba/BHDEKML
sambidila/BH
sambuka/BHEDK
sanda/BH
sansa/BHF
sansuka/BHEL
santisa/BH
santu/A
sawula/BHC
sema/BHEC
semisa/BHDK
sengumuna/BHC
sepedisa/BH
sepela/BHEDCL
siama/BEDL
sikisa/BHCG
sila/BHG
simba/HBFDEGC
sindani/A
singa/BHCGF
soba/BEH
soka/BHED
solula/BH
sondama/BHEDCKL
songa/BHEMFKLC
sonika/BEDH
sosa/BKDHK
suka/BHELDK
sukinisa/BH
sumba/BHDEF
sumbulula/BHDE
sumuka/BHEGL
susumuka/EBHGL
swana/BHED
sweka/BHDK
tablo/A
tadila/BHG
tafuna/BH
tala/BHCGQ
tambika/BHDECOK
tambwisa/BH
tanda/BHEFDKL
tanduka/BH
tanga/BHEDFK
tangidila/BH
tata/ABHDEKL
tatika/BHC
teka/BHCGEDF
tekulula/BH
tela/BHGE
telema/BHEGL
temunuka/BH
temwe/A
tenda/BHEDG
tendula/BHEDC
tesa/BHCEGD
tesakana/BH
tetumuna/BH
tiamuka/BHDEC
tima/BHEGLK
timuna/BHGEC
tina/BHEL
tinda/BHFNCDK
tindika/BHEL
tobodisisa/BH
tobuka/BHEG
tobula/BHC
toka-toka/BH
toka/BHEC
toko/A
toluka/BHEDC
toma/BHEC
tomboka/BHDEKL
tombuka/BHDK
tombola/BH
tonda/ACBFGH
tondanisa/BH
tonga/BHGQ
tuba/BGHDECK
kutuba-tuba/BH
tubanaka/BHEG
tuka/BHEL
tula/BGEDHC
tuluka/BHECD
tulula/BH
tumba/BCOHF
tumbula/BCGH
tunga/BGHDEFC
tungulula/BH
tuta/BHDECG
twadila/BH
twala/BHEDG
Ukaristia/A
vanda/HBDEKLC
vata/BHED
vidisa/BCOHC
vila/BCOFGH
vilakana/BH
vimba/BHEDGKL
vukisa/BHEKD
vumila/BH
vumina/BHEC
vumisa/BH
vutuka/BHDCK
vuza/BHDEKL
vwalangasa/BHDK
vwama/BHEL
vwanza/BHD
vwata/BHDE
vweza/BHFGC
wa/BHC
waluka/BHE
yala/BHC
yaluka/BH
yamba/BHG
yambakana/BH
yanga/BDECHLK
yantika/BDEH
yekama/BHFEDG
yiba/BHGED
yibuka/BHEDKL
yidika/BHEDKL
yika/BHFGELQ
yikilaka/BH
yimba/BCHDEKF
yina/BHGEAC
yinda/BHFE
yinga/BHGED
yituka/BCHEDG
yobila/BHF
yobisa/BHF
yoka/BHDEFGCK
yondama/BH
yonga/BHGEL
yotila/BHE
yotisa/BHC
yula/BHGC
yuma/BHELG
yungula/BHDE
yunsa/BHC
yuvula/HGBC
yuyu/A
zaba/BHEDGCLQ
zanga/DEBH
zenga/HBGDFC
zengaka/GHB
zieta/BHGE
zika/BHFEDL
zinga/HBGDFKLE
zitisa/BHGC
zola/BHFGC
zomba/BHED
zonza/BHF
zwa/BCH
ngenzi/A
sintri/AI
guna/BH
dileka/M
kinganga-ngombo/N
difulu-fulu/M
dipambu/M
dizanga/M
mbengi/A
musongo/P
nkolama/BH
